Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 3 Perfection and Priority
§ 28-9-319. Rights and title of consignee with respect to creditors and purchasers.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, for purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of goods from, a consignee, while the goods are in the possession of the consignee, the consignee is deemed to have rights and title to the goods identical to those the consignor had or had power to transfer.

For purposes of determining the rights of a creditor of a consignee, law other than this chapter determines the rights and title of a consignee while goods are in the consignee’s possession if, under this part, a perfected security interest held by the consignor would have priority over the rights of the creditor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-319, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-320. Buyer of goods.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a buyer in ordinary course of business, other than a person buying farm products from a person engaged in farming operations, takes free of a security interest created by the buyer’s seller, even if the security interest is perfected and the buyer knows of its existence. A buyer who, in the ordinary course of business, buys farm products from a person engaged in farming operations or a commission merchant or selling agent who in the ordinary course of business sells farm products for a person engaged in farming operations shall take and sell free of a security interest created by his seller, even though the security interest is perfected and the buyer or commission merchant or selling agent knows of the existence of such interest, if he has registered with the secretary of state pursuant to section 28-9-523(h)[, Idaho Code,] and the security interest is not listed on the most recent master list or cumulative supplement distributed by the secretary of state pursuant to section 28-9-523(i)[, Idaho Code], unless he has received written notification, as that term is used in applicable federal law and regulation, of the security interest from the secretary of state, his seller or the secured party.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a buyer of goods from a person who used or bought the goods for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes takes free of a security interest, even if perfected, if the buyer buys:

Without knowledge of the security interest;

For value;

Primarily for the buyer’s personal, family or household purposes; and

Before the filing of a financing statement covering the goods.

To the extent that it affects the priority of a security interest over a buyer of goods under subsection (b) of this section, the period of effectiveness of a filing made in the jurisdiction in which the seller is located is governed by section 28-9-316(a) and (b)[, Idaho Code].

A buyer in ordinary course of business buying oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead or after extraction takes free of an interest arising out of an encumbrance.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not affect a security interest in goods in the possession of the secured party under section 28-9-313.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-320, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-321. Licensee of general intangible and lessee of goods in ordinary course of business.

In this section, “licensee in ordinary course of business” means a person that becomes a licensee of a general intangible in good faith, without knowledge that the license violates the rights of another person in the general intangible, and in the ordinary course from a person in the business of licensing general intangibles of that kind. A person becomes a licensee in the ordinary course if the license to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the licensor is engaged or with the licensor’s own usual or customary practices.

A licensee in ordinary course of business takes its rights under a nonexclusive license free of a security interest in the general intangible created by the licensor, even if the security interest is perfected and the licensee knows of its existence.

A lessee in ordinary course of business takes its leasehold interest free of a security interest in the goods created by the lessor, even if the security interest is perfected and the lessee knows of its existence.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-321, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-322. Priorities among conflicting security interests in and agricultural liens on same collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, priority among conflicting security interests and agricultural liens in the same collateral is determined according to the following rules:

Conflicting perfected security interests and agricultural liens rank according to priority in time of filing or perfection. Priority dates from the earlier of the time a filing covering the collateral is first made or the security interest or agricultural lien is first perfected, if there is no period thereafter when there is neither filing nor perfection.

A perfected security interest or agricultural lien has priority over a conflicting unperfected security interest or agricultural lien.

The first security interest or agricultural lien to attach or become effective has priority if conflicting security interests and agricultural liens are unperfected.

For the purposes of subsection (a)(1) of this section:

The time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in proceeds; and

The time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral supported by a supporting obligation is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in the supporting obligation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, a security interest in collateral which qualifies for priority over a conflicting security interest under section 28-9-327, 28-9-328, 28-9-329, 28-9-330 or 28-9-331 [, Idaho Code,] also has priority over a conflicting security interest in:

Any supporting obligation for the collateral; and

Proceeds of the collateral if:

the security interest in proceeds is perfected;

the proceeds are cash proceeds or of the same type as the collateral; and

in the case of proceeds that are proceeds of proceeds, all intervening proceeds are cash proceeds, proceeds of the same type as the collateral, or an account relating to the collateral.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, if a security interest in chattel paper, deposit accounts, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter of credit rights is perfected by a method other than filing, conflicting perfected security interests in proceeds of the collateral rank according to priority in time of filing.

Subsection (d) of this section applies only if the proceeds of the collateral are not cash proceeds, chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property or letter of credit rights.

Subsections (a) through (e) of this section are subject to:

Subsection (g) of this section and the other provisions of this part;

Section 28-4-210[, Idaho Code,] with respect to a security interest of a collecting bank;

Section 28-5-120[, Idaho Code,] with respect to a security interest of an issuer or nominated person; and

Section 28-9-110[, Idaho Code,] with respect to a security interest arising under chapter 2 or 12[, title 28, Idaho Code].
(g) A perfected agricultural lien on collateral has priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the same collateral if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-322, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-322A. Security interests in crops for provision of agricultural chemicals. — (a) As used in this section:

“Agricultural chemical” means fertilizers and other chemicals applied to crops or land which is to be used for the raising of crops, including pesticides, soil amendments and plant regulators.

“Fall agricultural chemical security interest” means a security interest in specific crops growing or to be grown granted by a grower to a supplier to secure the grower’s obligation to repay value given by the supplier to enable the grower to purchase from the supplier (A) agricultural chemicals to apply to such crops or to land on which such crops will be grown, and (B) application of such agricultural chemicals if such application is performed by the supplier. To qualify as a fall agricultural chemical security interest, the security interest must also satisfy the following conditions:

Before supplying the agricultural chemicals to the grower, the supplier and grower provide the lender with a notification statement and opportunity to respond in accordance with this section;

The security interest is perfected within twenty (20) days after the agricultural chemicals are delivered to the grower; and

The agricultural chemicals are actually applied to the grower’s land or crops during the period September 1 through December 15.

“Grower” shall mean a specified debtor of a lender.

“Lender” shall mean the holder of an existing perfected security interest in crops of a grower.

“Letter of response” shall mean a statement by a lender containing the information specified in subsection (j) of this section.

“Notification statement” shall mean a statement by a supplier containing the information specified in subsection (h) of this section.

“Supplier” shall mean a person who supplies agricultural chemicals to a grower.

The name and address of the owner (if other than the grower) of such real property;

A description of the crops growing or to be grown on such real property as to which the supplier intends to supply agricultural chemicals and upon which the supplier claims or intends to obtain a security interest;

The social security number or federal tax identification number of the grower to whom the supplier intends to provide agricultural chemicals; and

The social security number or federal tax identification number of the supplier providing the notice.

Within fifteen (15) days after actual receipt of a notification statement, the lender shall deposit in the U.S. mail, certified, a letter of response to the supplier. A copy of the lender’s letter of response shall be sent to the grower.

(b) A supplier may obtain a fall agricultural chemical security interest as provided in this section. To the extent not otherwise expressly provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter apply to a fall agricultural chemical security interest. The amount secured by a fall agricultural security interest shall be the lesser of: (i) the agreed charges for the agricultural chemicals and application costs provided pursuant to the notification statement; or (ii) the amount of the anticipated charges as reflected in the notification statement.

(c) A fall agricultural chemical security interest attaches to the existing crops upon the land where the agricultural chemical is applied, or if crops are not planted at the time of the application, to the next production crop from that land. It does not attach to crops already harvested or which are harvested before December 15 from such land, or to crops to be grown on such land after the next production crop, or to crops grown on other land than that identified in the notification statement.

(d) A fall agricultural chemical security interest is perfected by filing a financing statement.

(e) A fall agricultural chemical security interest shall have priority over a conflicting security interest in the same crops and identifiable proceeds thereof except for a prior perfected fall agricultural chemical security interest. In the event of any commingling of crops or proceeds covered by a fall agricultural chemical security interest with other crops or proceeds, the burden of proving the applicability of the fall agricultural chemical security interest to any particular crops or proceeds is on the supplier asserting it.

(f) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the priority of agricultural liens established by the statutes creating such liens, and a perfected agricultural lien shall have priority over a conflicting security interest (including a fall agricultural chemical security interest) if the statute creating the agricultural lien provides such priority.

(g) A supplier may notify the lender that the supplier intends to supply agricultural chemicals to the grower and that the supplier requests the lender to issue a letter of response. In order to so notify the lender, the supplier shall provide a notification statement to the lender in an envelope marked CROP SECURITY INTEREST NOTIFICATION STATEMENT, sent by certified mail addressed to the lender at the address for such lender shown on such lender’s most recently filed UCC-1F financing statement regarding that grower.

(h) A notification statement shall contain:

(1) The name, address and signature of the supplier providing the notification statement;

(2) The date the notification statement was prepared;

(3) The name and address of the lender;

(4) The name and address of the person to whom the lender’s response to the supplier should be addressed;

(5) A description and anticipated date of the application of agricultural chemicals and the anticipated charges for the agricultural chemicals, including anticipated application costs;

(6) The name, address and signature of the grower to whom the supplier furnished or intends to furnish agricultural chemicals;

(7) A reasonable description of the real estate sufficient to identify the same where the agricultural chemicals are to be applied;

(j) A letter of response shall contain the name, address and signature of the lender, and either

(1) A statement by the lender that there is an outstanding commitment for operating financing from the lender to the grower, and that the lender shall reserve the amount in the notification statement for the purpose of honoring drafts or other demands for payment by the supplier accompanied by invoices signed by the grower or other proof of delivery signed by the grower; or

(2) A statement by the lender that the lender shall subordinate the priority of its security interest in specified crops of the grower to the priority of the security interest in such crops obtained or to be obtained by the supplier, and specifying that the maximum amount of such subordination shall be the amount stated in the notification statement; or
(3) A statement by the lender that it declines to either reserve funds or subordinate its security interest.

(k) If the lender’s letter of response states that the lender declines to either reserve funds or subordinate its security interest, the respective rights of the lender and the supplier are not affected by this section and the relative priority between the lender’s security interest in crops, and any security interest obtained by the supplier in such crops, shall be determined according to the ordinary rules governing the priority of conflicting security interests in the same collateral, unless the supplier’s security interest is a fall agricultural chemical security interest.

(
l
) If the lender does not mail its letter of response to the supplier within fifteen (15) days after receiving the notification statement, and the supplier has perfected a security interest in such crops or perfects such security interest within ten (10) days after the expiration of the fifteen (15) day period for the lender to respond, the supplier’s perfected security interest in such crops shall take priority over the lender’s perfected security interest in such crops, but only to the extent of the lesser of (1) the amount stated in the notification statement, or (2) the unpaid agreed charges for the agricultural chemicals identified in the notification statement and actually applied to, or for the benefit of, such crops.

(m) Any amounts repaid by any person on the grower’s obligation for which the supplier has obtained an agricultural chemical security interest shall reduce the value of the agricultural chemical security interest on a dollar-for-dollar basis, and amounts may not be reborrowed or readvanced under the same notification statement. If the supplier receives proceeds of any collateral of the lender (other than proceeds of the crops covered by the fall agricultural security interest), such proceeds shall be turned over to the lender. In order to obtain the benefits of this section, any additional sales of agricultural chemicals not included in the original notification statement must be the subject of a new notification statement, to which the lender may issue a new letter of response.

(n) No one but the supplier shall be entitled to rely on a letter of response. Rights (if any) under a letter of response are not assignable, except in connection with an assignment by the supplier of the entire security interest to which such letter of response relates. By issuing a letter of response and performing thereunder, the lender does not become a partner, joint venturer or fiduciary of either the grower or the supplier.

(o)(1) The secretary of state shall publish a form substantially as follows:

Name of supplier ...............................

Address ...............................

SSN/TIN ...............................

Date notification statement was prepared ...............................

Name of lender ...............................

Address ...............................

Name of person to whom lender’s response to supplier should be
addressed ...............................

Address ...............................

Description and anticipated date of the application of agricultural chemicals ...............................

Anticipated charges for the agricultural chemicals ...............................

Anticipated charges for application, if not included in charges for chemicals ...............................
Name of grower ...............................

Address ...............................

SSN/TIN ...............................

Reasonable description of the real estate where the agricultural chemicals are to be applied ...............................

...............................

Name of owner of real property (if other than grower) ...............................

...............................

Address ...............................

Crops growing or to be grown on such real property as to which the supplier intends to supply agricultural chemicals and upon which supplier intends to obtain a security interest ...............................

...............................

Signature of supplier ...............................

Signature of grower ...............................

(2) On the reverse side of the form described in subsection (1) of this section, the secretary of state shall provide a form for the lender’s letter of response, substantially as follows:

Name of lender ...............................

Address ...............................

Lender responds to notification statement as follows (choose one):

An outstanding commitment for operating financing exists for this grower. Of that commitment, lender hereby reserves the amount specified in the notification statement for the purpose of honoring drafts or other demands for payment by supplier, accompanied by invoices signed by grower or other proof of delivery signed by grower.

Lender hereby subordinates the priority of its security interest in (specify crops) .................... of grower to the priority of the security interest in such crops obtained or to be obtained by supplier, such subordination to be in the amount specified in the notification statement.

Lender declines to either reserve funds or subordinate its security interest.

Signature of lender ........................................

(3) Suppliers and lenders are required to use the form published by the secretary of state.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-322A, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-323. Future advances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, for purposes of determining the priority of a perfected security interest under section 28-9-322(a)(1)[, Idaho Code], perfection of the security interest dates from the time an advance is made to the extent that the security interest secures an advance that:

Is made while the security interest is perfected only:

under section 28-9-309[, Idaho Code,] when it attaches; or

temporarily under section 28-9-312(e), (f) or (g)[, Idaho Code]; and

Is not made pursuant to a commitment entered into before or while the security interest is perfected by a method other than under section 28-9-309 or 28-9-312(e), (f) or (g)[, Idaho Code].

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a security interest is subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor to the extent that the security interest secures an advance made more than forty-five (45) days after the person becomes a lien creditor unless the advance is made:

Without knowledge of the lien; or

Pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lien.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a security interest held by a secured party that is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a buyer of goods other than a buyer in ordinary course of business takes free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of:

The time the secured party acquires knowledge of the buyer’s purchase; or

Forty-five (45) days after the purchase.

Subsection (d) of this section does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the buyer’s purchase and before the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a lessee of goods, other than a lessee in ordinary course of business, takes the leasehold interest free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of:

The time the secured party acquires knowledge of the lease; or

Forty-five (45) days after the lease contract becomes enforceable.

Subsection (f) of this section does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lease and before the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-323, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-324. Priority of purchase-money security interests.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a perfected purchase-money security interest in goods other than inventory or livestock has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same goods and, except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-327[, Idaho Code], a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, if the purchase-money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the collateral or within twenty (20) days thereafter.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a perfected purchase-money security interest in inventory has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same inventory, has priority over a conflicting security interest in chattel paper or an instrument constituting proceeds of the inventory and in proceeds of the chattel paper, if so provided in section 28-9-330[, Idaho Code], and, except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-327[, Idaho Code], also has priority in identifiable cash proceeds of the inventory to the extent the identifiable cash proceeds are received on or before the delivery of the inventory to a buyer, if:

The purchase-money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the inventory;

The purchase-money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

The holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within five (5) years before the debtor receives possession of the inventory; and

The notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase-money security interest in inventory of the debtor and describes the inventory.

Subsections (b)(2) through (b)(4) of this section apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of inventory:

If the purchase-money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

If the purchase-money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under section 28-9-312(f)[, Idaho Code], before the beginning of the twenty (20) day period thereunder.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a perfected purchase-money security interest in livestock that are farm products has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same livestock and, except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-327[, Idaho Code], a perfected security interest in their identifiable proceeds and identifiable products in their unmanufactured states also has priority, if:

The purchase-money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the livestock;

The purchase-money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

The holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within six (6) months before the debtor receives possession of the livestock; and
(4) The notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase-money security interest in livestock of the debtor and describes the livestock.

Subsections (d)(2) through (d)(4) of this section apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of livestock:

If the purchase-money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

If the purchase-money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under section 28-9-312(f)[, Idaho Code], before the beginning of the twenty (20) day period thereunder.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a perfected purchase-money security interest in software has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same collateral and, except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-327[, Idaho Code], a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, to the extent that the purchase-money security interest in the goods in which the software was acquired for use has priority in the goods and proceeds of the goods under this section.

If more than one (1) security interest qualifies for priority in the same collateral under subsection (a), (b), (d) or (f) of this section:

A security interest securing an obligation incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral has priority over a security interest securing an obligation incurred for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of collateral; and

In all other cases, section 28-9-322(a)[, Idaho Code,] applies to the qualifying security interests.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-324, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-325. Priority of security interests in transferred collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a security interest created by a debtor is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral created by another person if:

The debtor acquired the collateral subject to the security interest created by the other person;

The security interest created by the other person was perfected when the debtor acquired the collateral; and

There is no period thereafter when the security interest is unperfected.

Subsection (a) of this section subordinates a security interest only if the security interest:

Otherwise would have priority solely under section 28-9-322(a) or 28-9-324[, Idaho Code]; or

Arose solely under section 28-2-711(3) or 28-12-508(5)[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-325, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-326. Priority of security interests created by new debtor.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a security interest that is created by a new debtor in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights and [is] perfected by a filed financing statement that would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the application of sections 28-9-316(i)(1) and 28-9-508, Idaho Code, is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral which is perfected other than by such a filed financing statement.

The other provisions of this part determine the priority among conflicting security interests in the same collateral perfected by filed financing statements described in subsection (a) of this section. However, if the security agreements to which a new debtor became bound as debtor were not entered into by the same original debtor, the conflicting security interests rank according to priority in time of the new debtor’s having become bound.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-326, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 7, p. 381.

§ 28-9-327. Priority of security interests in deposit account.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same deposit account:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of the deposit account under section 28-9-104[, Idaho Code,] has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, security interests perfected by control under section 28-9-314[, Idaho Code,] rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

A security interest perfected by control under section 28-9-104(a)(3)[, Idaho Code,] has priority over a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-327, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-328. Priority of security interests in investment property.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of investment property under section 28-9-106[, Idaho Code,] has priority over a security interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the investment property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which has control under section 28-9-106[, Idaho Code,] rank according to priority in time of:

If the collateral is a security, obtaining control;

If the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and:

if the secured party obtained control under section 28-8-106(4)(a)[, Idaho Code], the secured party’s becoming the person for which the securities account is maintained;

if the secured party obtained control under section 28-8-106(4)(b)[, Idaho Code], the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the secured party’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account; or

if the secured party obtained control through another person under section 28-8-106(4)(c)[, Idaho Code], the time on which priority would be based under this paragraph if the other person were the secured party; or

A security interest held by a securities intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities account maintained with the securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

A security interest held by a commodity intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

A security interest in a certificated security in registered form which is perfected by taking delivery under section 28-9-313(a)[, Idaho Code,] and not by control under section 28-9-314[, Idaho Code,] has priority over a conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control.

Conflicting security interests created by a broker, securities intermediary or commodity intermediary which are perfected without control under section 28-9-106[, Idaho Code,] rank equally.

In all other cases, priority among conflicting security interests in investment property is governed by sections 28-9-322 and 28-9-323[, Idaho Code].

(C) If the collateral is a commodity contract carried with a commodity intermediary, the satisfaction of the requirement for control specified in section 28-9-106(b)(2)[, Idaho Code,] with respect to commodity contracts carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-328, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-329. Priority of security interests in letter of credit right.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same letter of credit right:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of the letter of credit right under section 28-9-107[, Idaho Code,] has priority to the extent of its control over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

Security interests perfected by control under section 28-9-314[, Idaho Code,] rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-329, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-330. Priority of purchaser of chattel paper or instrument.

A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if:

In good faith and in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under section 28-9-105[, Idaho Code]; and

The chattel paper does not indicate that it has been assigned to an identified assignee other than the purchaser.

A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed other than merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under section 28-9-105[, Idaho Code,] in good faith, in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-327[, Idaho Code], a purchaser having priority in chattel paper under subsection (a) or (b) of this section also has priority in proceeds of the chattel paper to the extent that:

Section 28-9-322[, Idaho Code,] provides for priority in the proceeds; or

The proceeds consist of the specific goods covered by the chattel paper or cash proceeds of the specific goods, even if the purchaser’s security interest in the proceeds is unperfected.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-331(a)[, Idaho Code], a purchaser of an instrument has priority over a security interest in the instrument perfected by a method other than possession if the purchaser gives value and takes possession of the instrument in good faith and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

For purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the holder of a purchase-money security interest in inventory gives new value for chattel paper constituting proceeds of the inventory.

For purposes of subsections (b) and (d) of this section, if chattel paper or an instrument indicates that it has been assigned to an identified secured party other than the purchaser, a purchaser of the chattel paper or instrument has knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-330, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-331. Priority of rights of purchasers of instruments, documents and securities under other chapters — Priority of interests in financial assets and security entitlements under chapter 8.

This chapter does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a protected purchaser of a security. These holders or purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected, to the extent provided in chapters 3, 7 and 8[, title 28, Idaho Code].

This chapter does not limit the rights of or impose liability on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of a claim under chapter 8[, title 28, Idaho Code].

Filing under this chapter does not constitute notice of a claim or defense to the holders, or purchasers, or persons described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-331, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704

§ 28-9-332. Transfer of money — Transfer of funds from deposit account.

A transferee of money takes the money free of a security interest unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

A transferee of funds from a deposit account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-332, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-333. Priority of certain liens arising by operation of law.

In this section, “possessory lien” means an interest, other than a security interest or an agricultural lien:

Which secures payment or performance of an obligation for services or materials furnished with respect to goods by a person in the ordinary course of the person’s business;

Which is created by statute or rule of law in favor of the person; and

Whose effectiveness depends on the person’s possession of the goods.

A possessory lien on goods has priority over a security interest in the goods unless the lien is created by a statute that expressly provides otherwise.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-333, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.